Wisconsin, session 2025, SB763.
do enact as follows:SB763,11Section 1. 25.15 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB763,2,5225.15 (2) Standard of responsibility. (intro.) Except as provided in s. 325.17 (2) and (3) (c), and subject to s. 25.182 (3) and (4), the standard of 4responsibility applied to the board when it manages money and property shall be 5all of the following:SB763,21Section 2. 25.182 of the statutes is renumbered 25.182 (2) and amended to 2read:SB763,3,9325.182 (2) In addition to the management authority provided under any other 4provision of law, and notwithstanding any limitation on the board’s management 5authority provided under any other provision of law except subs. (3) and (4), the 6board shall have authority to manage the money and property of the core 7retirement investment trust and, subject to s. 25.17 (5), the variable retirement 8investment trust in any manner that does not violate the standard of responsibility 9specified in s. 25.15 (2).SB763,310Section 3. 25.182 (1), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) of the statutes are created to 11read:SB763,3,121225.182 (1) In this section:SB763,3,1313(a) “Issuer” means an issuer of securities.SB763,3,1414(b) “Participant” has the meaning given in s. 40.02 (45).SB763,3,1715(c) “Proxy advisory firm” means a person that is engaged in the business of 16providing proxy voting advice, research, analysis, ratings, or recommendations to a 17person with an ownership interest in securities or to an issuer.SB763,3,1918(d) “Say-on-pay proposal” means a resolution subject to shareholder vote to 19approve the compensation of executives as required by 15 U.S.C. 78n-1 (a) (1).SB763,3,2120(e) “Shareholder-sponsored proposal” means a proposal submitted to an issuer 21by a shareholder under 17 CFR 240.14a-8.SB763,4,222(f) “Sole economic interest” means investment with the objective of 23maximizing risk-adjusted investment returns for participants over a time horizon 1consistent with the risk management profile for the core retirement investment 2trust and variable retirement investment trust.SB763,4,63(3) (a) In managing the money and property of the core retirement investment 4trust and the variable retirement investment trust, the board shall exercise its 5voting authority as to all shares held directly or indirectly by the board for the 6benefit of participants and in the sole economic interest of participants.SB763,4,87(b) With respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal, there is a presumption 8that the board has complied with par. (a) if all of the following apply:SB763,4,1091. The board votes consistently with the recommendation of the issuer’s board 10of directors.SB763,4,12112. A majority of the directors on the issuer’s board of directors are 12independent directors.SB763,4,1513(c) With respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal, if the board votes in a 14manner inconsistent with the recommendation of the issuer’s board of directors, the 15board is presumed to have complied with par. (a) if any of the following applies:SB763,4,18161. The board conducts and documents an economic analysis that satisfies the 17requirements under sub. (5) and that demonstrates that the board’s vote is in the 18sole economic interest of participants.SB763,4,22192. A 3rd party conducts and documents an economic analysis on behalf of the 20board that satisfies the requirements under sub. (5) and that the board determines 21adequately demonstrates the board’s vote is in the sole economic interest of 22participants.SB763,4,2323(d) The board may not vote in a manner that does any of the following:SB763,5,211. Subordinates the economic interest of participants to any environmental, 2social, policy, governance, or ideological goal.SB763,5,632. Promotes any environmental, social, policy, governance, or ideological goal 4unless, based on an economic analysis that satisfies the requirements under sub. 5(5), the board determines that the vote is in the sole economic interest of 6participants.SB763,5,127(4) (a) Except as provided in par. (c), and subject to par. (e), if the board 8engages the services of a proxy advisory firm to provide proxy voting advice with 9respect to shareholder-sponsored proposals, the board may not adopt a 10recommendation of the proxy advisory firm with respect to a shareholder-sponsored 11proposal unless the proxy advisory firm bases its recommendation on the sole 12economic interest of participants.SB763,5,1513(b) With respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal, there is a presumption 14that a proxy advisory firm’s recommendation is based on the sole economic interest 15of participants for purposes of par. (a) if all of the following apply:SB763,5,17161. The recommendation is consistent with the recommendation of the issuer’s 17board of directors.SB763,5,19182. A majority of the directors on the issuer’s board of directors are 19independent directors.SB763,5,2220(c) The board may, with respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal, adopt a 21proxy advisory firm’s recommendation that is inconsistent with the 22recommendation of the issuer’s board of directors if all of the following apply:SB763,6,2231. The proxy advisory firm conducted and documented an economic analysis 1demonstrating that its recommendation is in the sole economic interest of 2participants and provided this economic analysis to the board.SB763,6,532. The proxy advisory firm’s recommendation does not relate, in whole or in 4part, to a matter of executive compensation or a decision to pursue adjudication of a 5business dispute in court.SB763,6,96(d) Subject to par. (e), if the board engages the services of a proxy advisory 7firm to provide proxy voting advice with respect to a company-sponsored say-on-pay 8proposal, the board may not, with respect to the proposal, adopt a recommendation 9of the proxy advisory firm if any of the following applies: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb763 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb763 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB763 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB763 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB763: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting